Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Law reviews. —

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

For article, “International Law Affecting Water Rights in the Western States,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 67 (1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d Waters § 1 et seq.

Tort liability for pollution from underground storage tank, 5 ALR5th 1.

93 C.J.S. Waters § 1 et seq.

§ 41-1-101.
Permit for construction of Glendo Reservoir and storage of water; restrictions; adjudication of water rights after issuance.

That the state engineer of the state of Wyoming is hereby authorized to approve when prepared in proper form and checked against his records, the application of the United States of America, bureau of reclamation, for permit to construct the Glendo Reservoir and to store water of the state of Wyoming from the North Platte River for the irrigation of lands in the states of Wyoming and Nebraska, and for development of power, flood control and silt control purposes.

This permit may contain whatever restrictions the state engineer may consider necessary to protect water rights and other rights of the state of Wyoming.

After issuance of permit under legislative authority and completion of the work according to terms of the permit, the state board of control is hereby authorized to adjudicate the water right upon proper showing of completion of construction. This authorization is made to conform with W.S.

41-4-104

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.

§ 41-1-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 8, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 195, ch. 146, §§ 1 through 3, pertained to the library of water resources.

Laws 2005, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

§ 41-1-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 8, § 1.

§ 41-1-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 8, § 1.

§ 41-1-105.
Use of underground water in adjoining state; adjudication by board of control.

After issuance of the permit under legislative authority and completion of the work according to the terms of the permit, the board of control may adjudicate said underground water rights upon proof of beneficial use as provided by W.S.

41-4-511

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 158, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.5.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 41-1-106.
Water and related land resources planning; commission's responsibility.

The commission is responsible for the coordination of Wyoming’s water and related land resources planning and with the approval of the governor is authorized to enter into contracts and agreements with the United States of America or its duly authorized representative agency for planning pertaining to the utilization of Wyoming’s water and related land resources.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.6; Laws 1973, ch. 233, § 2; 1977, ch. 103, § 1; 1979, ch. 59, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to creation of water development commission, see §

41-2-117

.

§ 41-1-107.
Water and related land resources planning; authority of commission.

With the approval of the governor the commission is authorized to accept federal funds through grants or matching funds or from other sources for water and related land resources planning.

The commission is authorized:

To adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to implement any programs which may be required of the state by federal water and related land resources planning legislation; and

To implement any programs which are required by this legislation to make the state eligible to receive funds from the federal government to carry out water and related land resources planning.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 138, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.7; Laws 1973, ch. 233, § 2; 1977, ch. 106, § 1; 1979, ch. 59, § 2.

§ 41-1-108.
Water and related land resources planning; dispositions of monies and commission offices.

Any funds so received shall be deposited with the state treasurer, to be accounted for as provided by law. Money may be expended as provided by law. All records, property, personnel positions and unused funds not necessary for administrative duties as determined by the state engineer shall be transferred for water planning development from the state engineer’s budget to the commission.

The commission shall occupy the facilities presently occupied by the water planning division of the office of state engineer or such facilities as may be made available.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 138, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.8; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1979, ch. 59, § 2.

§ 41-1-109.
Interference with natural flow of thermal springs; authority to correct.

The state engineer is given the authority to abolish, correct, discontinue or stop any condition which interferes with the natural flow of any thermal spring on state lands.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 91, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.9.

§ 41-1-110.
Interference with natural flow of thermal springs; nonthermal water or mineral development.

Nothing in this act [§§

41-1-109

through

41-1-111

] shall be construed to limit any nonthermal water, or mineral development so long as said development does not interfere with the natural flow of the thermal springs covered by this act.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 91, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.10.

§ 41-1-111.
Interference with natural flow of thermal springs; injunctive relief.

The state engineer may seek injunctive relief to implement this act [§§

41-1-109

through

41-1-111

].

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 91, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.11.

§ 41-1-112.
Conducting business electronically.

The state engineer’s office may allow its business to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, W.S.

40-21-118

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.